Hawaii statutes.
[§661-30] Relief from retaliatory
actions. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any employee,
contractor, or agent shall be entitled to all relief necessary to make that
employee, contractor, or agent whole, if that employee, contractor, or agent is
discharged, demoted, suspended, threatened, harassed, or in any other manner
discriminated against in the terms and conditions of employment, contract, or
agency relationship because of lawful acts done by the employee, contractor,
agent, or associated others in furtherance of an action under section 661-25 or
other efforts to stop or address any conduct described in section 661-21(a).

(b) Relief under subsection (a) shall include
reinstatement with the same seniority status that the employee, contractor, or
agent would have had but for the discrimination, two times the amount of back
pay, interest on the back pay, and compensation for any special damages
sustained as a result of the discrimination, including litigation costs and
reasonable attorney's fees. An action for relief from retaliatory actions
under subsection (a) may be brought in the appropriate court of this State for
the relief provided in this part.

(c) An action for relief from retaliatory
actions under subsection (a) shall be brought within three years of the
retaliatory conduct upon which the action is based. [L 2012, c 294, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next